Utah statutes.
16-10a-909.   Limitations on indemnification of directors.
(1)  A provision treating a corporation's indemnification of, or advance for
expenses to, directors that is contained in its articles of incorporation or
bylaws, in a resolution of its shareholders or board of directors, or in a
contract (except an insurance policy) or otherwise, is valid only if and to
the extent the provision is not inconsistent with this part.  If the articles
of incorporation limit indemnification or advance of expenses, indemnification
and advance of expenses are valid only to the extent not inconsistent with the
articles of incorporation.
(2)  This part does not limit a corporation's power to pay or reimburse
expenses incurred by a director in connection with the director's appearance
as a witness in a proceeding at a time when the director has not been made a
named defendant or respondent to the proceeding.
